Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-272
County agricultural society; reinstatement; certificate; recording; requirements; effect.

The certificate for the renewal and continuance of the existence of a county agricultural society shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, who shall furnish a certified copy of the certificate under his or her hand and seal of office. The certified copy shall be recorded in the office of the clerk of the county in which the principal office of the society is located in this state in a book kept for the purpose. The certificate or a certified copy of the certificate duly certified under the hand of the Secretary of State and his or her seal of office, accompanied with the certificate of the clerk of the county where it is recorded under the clerk's hand and seal of his or her office, stating that it had been recorded, the record of the same in the office of the clerk, or a copy of such record duly certified by the clerk, or the record of such certified copy, recorded in the county clerk's office, is evidence in all courts of law and equity of this state.

Laws 1995, LB 671, § 8;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 2-248;

Laws 1997, LB 469, § 23.